Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 352 Mining Regulations
352.133.
Approved self-rescuer devices — Caches of devices — Locations — Requirements — Felony for removal.

All underground miners shall be provided with an approved self-contained self-rescuer device and shall have that device within twenty-five (25) feet of them at all times. The self-contained self-rescuer shall be provided to the miners by the licensee at no cost to the miners.

In addition to the requirements for self-contained self-rescuers set forth in this section, all licensed premises shall maintain caches of self-contained self-rescuer devices which shall be stored in locations readily accessible to the primary and secondary escapeways or provide proof of an order for self-contained self-rescuers through the submission of a valid purchase order that clearly names the vendor, contact information for the vendor, the number of devices purchased, and the date of the order, which shall not be later than thirty (30) days after July 12, 2006. In all cases, the self-contained self-rescuers shall be in place by July 1, 2007, or shall be extended by the commissioner upon substantiated proof of unavailability.

The caches shall be maintained in sufficient numbers and locations determined in accordance with the most recent rules, standards, and regulations issued by the United States Mine Safety and Health Administration and this section.

The caches shall be maintained in storage units capable of protecting the self-contained self-rescuers from water, dust, and any other condition which will cause deterioration of the self-contained self-rescuers.

The storage unit locations shall have reflective signs that read “SELF-RESCUERS” conspicuously posted as to be visible from the primary and secondary escapeways.

In addition to the requirements set forth in this section for self-contained self-rescuers, the mine operator shall provide for each person who is underground at least one (1) additional self-contained self-rescuer device which provides protection for a period of one (1) hour or longer, to cover all persons in the mine.

If a mantrip or mobile equipment is used to enter or exit the mine, additional self-contained self-rescuer devices, each of which provides protection for a period of one (1) hour or longer, shall be available for all persons who use the transportation from portal to portal.

It shall be a Class D felony for any person to remove a self-rescuer from the cache for purposes other than use during an emergency, or for repair, maintenance, or replacement or as authorized by the licensee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 308, § 46, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 13, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 16, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 14, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.135.
Lifeline cords and directional devices.

In all designated escapeways, each operator shall provide lifeline cords, with attached reflective material at not to exceed twenty-five (25) foot intervals and devices indicating the direction to the surface at not to exceed one hundred (100) foot intervals, from outby the loading point; provided, that in case of a shaft mine, such lifeline cords shall extend from outby to the loading point to the bottom of the designated escape shaft. Such lifeline cord shall be of flame-resistant material sufficient to allow miners to see and to use effectively to guide themselves out of the mine in the event of an emergency. All lifeline cords shall be made of flame-resistant material within one hundred eighty (180) days of June 26, 2007.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 147, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2006, ch. 185, § 17, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 15, effective June 26, 2007.

352.140.
Operation of cages and cars.

Only a certified hoistman shall be placed in charge of any mechanism used for lowering or hoisting any persons employed in the mine. Where automatic elevators are used and all safety devices are provided, the services of a hoistman are not required. A certified hoistman shall pass a test as to his knowledge of hoisting equipment and the precautions to be taken when raising or lowering men or materials. Certification of hoistmen shall be under such conditions and by tests prescribed by the commissioner.

No hoistman in charge of such machinery shall allow any person except such as may be designated for this purpose by the operator or superintendent to interfere with any part of the machinery.

In a mine worked by shaft, slope, or incline, no more than twenty (20) persons shall ride in any cage or car at one (1) time, without the approval of the mine inspector and the commissioner of the department, and no person shall ride on a loaded cage or car, except that where special man-cars or cages are employed to haul workmen on inclines the commissioner may regulate the method and procedure of handling of man-cars, cages, and workmen. Each cage or elevator installed after June 16, 1972, which is used for lowering and raising men shall have at least two and one-half (2-1/2) square feet of floor space for each person.

History.

2739-23: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 14; 2000, ch. 104, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 355, § 14, effective July 15, 2002.

352.145.
Restrictions on work where hazardous conditions exist — Requirement of visible warning devices and enclosed operator’s cabs at stockpiles with underground feeders or draw-off tunnels — Barrier requirements for haulage roadways — Examinations and equipment checks.

No employee of a surface coal mining operation shall be assigned, allowed, or required to perform work alone in any area where hazardous conditions exist that would endanger his safety unless he can communicate with others, can be heard, or can be seen.

At stockpiles with underground feeders or draw-off tunnels, the licensee shall install and maintain a visible warning device that shall be activated when the feeders are in operation.

The operator’s cab of all equipment being operated on or in the immediate area of a stockpile with underground feeders or draw-off tunnels shall be enclosed by a compartment and shall be furnished with a self-contained self-rescuer that is capable of providing oxygen for a period of not less than one (1) hour.

On all haulage roadways, berms, guardrails, concrete barriers, or other suitable devices shall be installed in such a manner that they extend to at least the mid-wheel height of the highest vehicle or equipment that regularly travels that type of roadway.

A surface preshift examination shall be conducted within three (3) hours prior to men working. A certified foreman shall check the areas where men are required to work or travel during the shift. Roadways, pit areas, highwalls, and dumping points shall be checked. If any hazardous conditions are found, they shall be corrected prior to men working in the area. A suitable record book shall be kept in the control of the mine foreman. Immediately after the examination of the mine or portion thereof, the mine foreman shall enter and sign a record of the examination in the book with ink. The record shall clearly show any danger discovered at the mine, and the action taken to correct the dangerous conditions. The record book shall, at all times during the working hours, be accessible to the mine inspector or analyst and the miner or his representative.

All equipment operators shall conduct a preoperational check of their equipment. All preoperational checks shall be recorded by the equipment operator and kept with the equipment and, if a hazard is found to exist on any piece of equipment that would render it unsafe to operate, the hazardous condition shall be reported to the mine foreman or mine superintendent. All appropriate repairs shall be made before the equipment is put back into operation, except for moving the equipment to a safe place for repairs. The record book of all hazardous conditions and repairs made shall be kept in the control of the mine foreman or mine superintendent at all times.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 410, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 478, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 94, § 16, effective June 26, 2007.

352.150.
Provisions concerning haulage roads, transportation of men, and first-aid equipment.

After June 16, 1972, on single-track haulage roads in mines, which the persons employed in the mine must use while performing their work or while traveling on foot to and from their work, there shall be places of refuge on one (1) side not less than five (5) feet in depth from the side of the mine car, and five (5) feet wide, and not more than ninety (90) feet apart. Refuge holes of the same dimensions shall also be provided at switch throws.

Special places of refuge are not required on haulage roads on which room necks or breakthroughs occur at regular intervals not exceeding ninety (90) feet, and thus furnish places of refuge, or on haulage roads in which the track is so laid as to give a minimum clearance on one (1) side of not less than thirty (30) inches from the side of any haulage engine or any mine car, the clearance to be on the side of the road opposite that upon which electric wires are strung, if electric wires are strung in the road.

No unauthorized person shall travel on foot to or from work upon any haulage road or slope where transportation is by track, when other roads in proper condition for travel are available.

On all main haulage roads where hauling is done by machinery the mine foreman shall provide a proper system of signals, and a conspicuous light or marker approved by the commissioner on the front and rear of every trip or train of cars when in motion in the mine.

Mantrips shall be operated at safe speeds consistent with the condition of roads and type of equipment used and shall be so controlled that they can be stopped within the limits of visibility, in no event at a speed in excess of twelve (12) miles per hour.

Each mantrip consisting of more than one (1) mine car of men shall be under the charge of a certified official, and it shall be operated independently of any loaded trip of coal or other material.

Cars on the mantrip shall not be overloaded, and sufficient cars in good mechanical condition shall be provided.

No material or tools except small hand tools shall be transported in the same car with men on any mantrip unless in a separate, enclosed compartment of the car, and all persons shall ride inside of mantrip cars, except the motorman and brakeman or trip rider.

Men shall not load or unload before the cars in which they are to ride or are riding come to a full stop, and men shall proceed in an orderly manner to and from mantrips.

A waiting station shall be provided where men are required to wait for mantrips or man-cages. It shall have sufficient room, ample clearance from moving equipment, and adequate seating facilities.

Power wires shall be guarded effectively at mantrip stations where there is a possibility of any person coming in contact with energized electric wiring while loading or unloading from the mantrip.

Cars used for transporting men on slopes shall be equipped with a safety device capable of stopping the trip in event of failure of the rope or couplings. The device shall be approved by the commissioner.

Where belts are used for transporting men, unless the commissioner finds that a safety hazard exists which cannot be corrected, the belt transport will be allowed, and a minimum clearance of eighteen (18) inches shall be maintained between the belt and the roof or cross bars, projecting equipment, cap pieces, overhead cables, wiring, and other objects; but where the height of the coal bed permits, the clearance shall not be less than twenty-four (24) inches.

Unless a greater speed is allowed by special permission from the commissioner, in which event the conditions, limitations, and rules imposed in connection with the grant of permission shall be observed, the belt speed shall not exceed two hundred fifty (250) feet per minute where the minimum overhead clearance is eighteen (18) inches, or three hundred (300) feet per minute when the minimum overhead clearance is twenty-four (24) inches, while men are loading, unloading, or being transported.

The space between men riding on a belt line shall not be less than six (6) feet.

Loading and unloading stations shall be illuminated properly.

A certified official or some other supervisory personnel appointed by the mine foreman shall supervise all mantrips.

At all mines utilizing track haulage or transportation, there shall be developed a safe and uniform system of traveling through all switch points to prevent collisions. This system shall be designed in a manner which ensures that all persons can determine who has the right of way in all circumstances. Information concerning this system shall be included in annual retraining.

Efficient equipment, either mobile or self-propelled, equipped with sufficient first-aid equipment and supplies, shall be available on all underground sections where men are present to transport all injured workers to the surface.

At those mines that do not have a contract or other arrangement for providing ambulance service, a 4-wheel-drive vehicle or other vehicle suitable to the terrain equipped with sufficient first-aid equipment and supplies shall be available to the mines or preparation facilities for the transportation of injured workers. At those mines that have a contract or other arrangement for providing ambulance service, the access road to the mine or preparation facility shall be kept in a condition which is passable by the ambulance vehicle or other emergency rescue equipment.

The commissioner shall be empowered to draft additional administrative regulations providing for transportation of men when necessary.

History.

2739-42: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 22; 1972, ch. 303, § 15; 1976, ch. 174, § 10; 1982, ch. 202, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 308, § 31, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 15, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 18, effective April 21, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 17, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.160.
First-class personnel to be employed in nongaseous mine having explosive gas or history of gas ignition. [Repealed.]

352.161.
Examination of conveyor belts.

All mines utilizing conveyor belts shall have one (1) or more persons to examine the conveyor belts while in operation in the mine to determine that no coal or mine refuse is being transported on the conveyor belt in a manner which would pose a threat to the health and safety of the employees or to the safety of the mine.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 258, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

352.170.
Approved electric lamps and multigas detectors required — Unauthorized devices for making lights and fires forbidden.

All underground mines shall be worked exclusively by the use of approved electric lamps for personal lighting.

A mine operator shall provide an MSHA-approved, handheld, multigas detector that can measure methane, oxygen, and carbon monoxide to each group of two (2) or more miners working in close proximity of each other underground, the foreman, fireboss, and to each person who works alone, such as pumpers, examiners, and outby miners. The mine operator shall make available one (1) multigas detector at the working face for use by any miner working on the section. Miners shall be trained in the proper use and calibration of the multigas detectors and shall document that the training has been provided. Signs shall be prominently posted at places miners gather with instructions on the proper use of multi-gas detectors.

No person shall at any time carry into any mine any intoxicants. No person shall at any time enter any underground mine with matches, lighters, pipes, cigars, cigarettes, or any device for making lights or fire not authorized or approved, including but not limited to electronic cigarettes, cigars, or any component that heats liquids or other material to produce vapor. The licensee shall at frequent intervals search, or cause to be searched, any person entering or about to enter the mine or inside the mine, to prevent the person from taking, carrying, or using the articles therein.

HISTORY:

2739-26: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 24; 1972, ch. 303, § 16; 1996, ch. 308, § 32, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 16, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 94, § 18, effective January 1, 2008; 2018 ch. 85, § 14, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.175.
Miners required to wear safety glasses.

All miners shall wear safety glasses as needed. The safety glasses shall be supplied to the miners by the coal operator at no cost to the miner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 246, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

352.180.
Notice of accident — Altering accident scene — Report of occupational injury — Investigation, assistance, and records — Failure to comply — Testing post-accident — Investigative powers of commissioner.

The superintendent of a mine or, if he or she is absent, the mine manager, or, if he or she is absent, the mine foreman in charge of the mine or his or her designee, shall, within fifteen (15) minutes of having actual knowledge of the occurrence of an accident as defined in 30 C.F.R. sec. 50.2(h)(1) to (9), and having access to the communication system as required under KRS 352.630(3), give notice to the department and to the representative of the miner, stating the particulars of the accident.

No person shall alter the scene of a mining accident in a manner that will interfere with the department’s investigation of the accident, except to the extent necessary to rescue an individual or to eliminate an imminent danger.

An occupational injury, as defined in 30 C.F.R. sec. 50.2(e), shall be reported in writing to the department within ten (10) business days on the cabinet-approved occupational injury form.

Upon receipt of notification of an occurrence set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the mine safety specialist shall immediately go to the scene of the accident and make an investigation and suggestions and render the assistance as he deems necessary for the future safety of the employees, investigate the cause of the fire, explosion, or accident, make a record thereof, and forward it to the commissioner.

The record of the investigations shall be preserved with the other records of the commissioner’s office. To aid in making the investigations, the commissioner or the mine safety specialist may compel the attendance of witnesses and administer oaths.

Failure to comply with the reporting requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall create a rebuttable presumption of an intentional order to violate mine safety laws that places miners in imminent danger of serious physical injury or death and shall be subject to revocation, suspension, or probation of the mine license and a civil monetary penalty of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

The Division of Mine Safety may require testing of certified persons to determine whether the presence of intoxicants or controlled or illicit substances are a contributing factor in any mine accident in which serious physical injury or loss of life occurs or which was reported under this section. The director or his or her designee may order the testing of certified persons who:

Were working in the immediate area of the accident; or

In the judgment of the director or his designee, may reasonably have contributed to or witnessed the accident or fatality.

The post-accident testing permitted by subsection (6) of this section shall:

Meet all guidelines set forth in KRS

351.182

,

351.183

,

351.184

, and

351.185

;

Be paid for by the Division of Mine Safety; and

Be performed on samples obtained within eight (8) hours of the accident.

Toxicology screens and eleven-panel drug testing shall be performed on victims when death occurs on mine property. The testing pursuant to this subsection may be performed on specimens of either blood, saliva, or other appropriate bodily fluids.

The commissioner or his or her authorized representative may compel the attendance of witnesses and administer oaths to investigate allegations of unsafe mining conditions or violations of mining laws even if no accident or injury has occurred.

History.

2739-27: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 25; 1972, ch. 303, § 17; 1996, ch. 308, § 33, effective April 9, 1996; 2006, ch. 185, § 19, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 241, § 20, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, §§ 19, 20, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 87, § 31, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 85, § 15, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). This section was amended by 2006 Ky. Acts chs. 185 and 241. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 185, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.190.
First-aid equipment.

For every fifty (50) men and fraction thereof employed underground, the operator of each mine shall keep on hand at the mine one (1) properly constructed stretcher, one (1) waterproof and one (1) woolen blanket, and all other necessary equipment required by the department.

History.

2739-24, 2739-32: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 18; 1976, ch. 174, § 11; 1980, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2000, ch. 104, § 17, effective July 14, 2000.

352.200.
Miner to keep working place safe — Exception. [Repealed.]

352.201.
Roof control plan — Retreat mining or pillaring operations.

The roof and ribs of all active underground roadways, travelways, and working places shall be supported or otherwise controlled adequately to protect persons from falls of the roof or ribs. A roof control plan and revision thereof suitable to the roof conditions and mining system of each mine and approved by the commissioner or his authorized representative shall be adopted and set out in printed form within six (6) months after June 16, 1972, and shall be kept on file in the regional office of the region where the mine is located. The plan shall show the type of support and spacing approved by the commissioner. No person shall proceed beyond the last permanent support unless adequate temporary support is provided. A copy of the plan shall be furnished the commissioner or his authorized representative and shall be available to the miners and their representatives.

The method of mining followed in any mine shall not expose the miner to unusual dangers from roof falls caused by excessive widths of rooms and entries or faulty pillar recovery methods.

The licensee, in accordance with the approved plan, shall provide at or near each working face and at other locations in the mine as the commissioner or his authorized representative may prescribe an ample supply of suitable materials of proper size with which to secure the roof of all working places in a safe manner. Safety posts, jacks, or other approved devices shall be used to protect the workmen when roof material is being taken down, crossbars are being installed, roof bolt holes are being drilled, roof bolts are being installed, and in other circumstances that may be appropriate. Loose roof and overhanging or loose faces and ribs shall be taken down or supported. Except in the case of recovery work, supports knocked out shall be replaced promptly.

Roof bolt recovery for reuse shall not be permitted.

Where workmen are exposed to danger from falls of roof, face, and ribs they shall examine and test the roof, face, and ribs before any other work is performed or machinery is started, and as frequently thereafter as may be necessary to insure safety. When dangerous conditions are found, they shall be corrected immediately.

Within forty-eight (48) hours before the commencement of any retreat mining or pillaring operations, the mine operator shall notify the Division of Mine Safety of its intention of beginning or resuming retreat mining or pillaring. The Division of Mine Safety shall document such notification in writing. Upon notification within the forty-eight (48) hour period from a mine operator, and, before retreat mining or pillaring operations can begin, the Division of Mine Safety shall ensure that every person who will be participating in the retreat mining operations is trained in the operator’s pillar removal plan.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 19; 1976, ch. 174, § 12; 1996, ch. 308, § 34, effective April 9, 1996; 2007, ch. 94, § 21, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 87, § 32, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.210.
Conduct in mine — intoxication, alcoholic beverage or controlled substance prohibited — Notification to director of violations of substance- or alcohol-abuse policies.

No person shall knowingly injure any shaft, lamp, instrument, air course, or brattice; obstruct or throw open airways; disturb any part of the machinery or appliances; open a door used for directing ventilation without closing it afterwards; enter any part of a mine against caution; disobey any order given in carrying out any of the provisions of KRS Chapter 351 or 352; or do any act endangering the life or health of any person employed in the mine or endangering the security of the mine.

No person shall enter or be on any licensed facility while intoxicated or under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance or be in possession of any alcoholic beverage or controlled substance at any licensed facility; provided, however, this shall not apply to private vehicles driven to and from the mine.

The licensee shall notify the director, by the close of the next business day, of any certified persons who have been discharged for violation of the company’s substance-abuse or alcohol-abuse policies or who tested positive and failed to complete an employee assistance program.

HISTORY:

2739-37: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 23; 2006, ch. 241, § 21, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 87, § 33, effective June 24, 2015.